South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 25, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-25-70.  (A) Each school district shall adopt and implement a written policy governing the use of substitute teachers. This policy must apply uniformly to all instructional settings, including general education classrooms, special education classrooms, and special education instructional services. (B) When a teacher or other instructional staff member providing special education instruction or services is absent, the district shall make reasonable efforts to provide a substitute teacher or other qualified personnel consistent with the district's policy for other classrooms. (C) A school district may not maintain or implement a policy or practice that excludes special education classrooms or services from substitute teacher coverage. (D) Nothing in this section requires a substitute teacher assigned to a special education classroom or service to hold special education certification unless otherwise required by state or federal law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on August 1, 2026. ----XX----